Utah statutes.
70A-9a-510.    Effectiveness of filed record.

(1)  A filed record is effective only to the extent that it was filed by a person that may file it under Section 70A-9a-509.

(2)  A record authorized by one secured party of record does not affect the financing statement with respect to another secured party of record.

(3)  A continuation statement that is not filed within the six-month period prescribed by Subsection 70A-9a-515(4) is ineffective.

